District of Columbia statutes.
20-724

When to render accounts; supervised administration.

(a)

General. —

Except as provided in section 20-731, a supervised personal representative shall render accounts:

(1)

within one year and one day of the first publication of notice pursuant to section 20-704;

(2)

within 9 months after the account referred to in paragraph (1) of this subsection and within 9 months of each subsequent account until the filing of the final account or the termination of the supervised personal representative’s appointment;

(3)

upon termination of the supervised personal representative’s appointment, as provided in subchapter III of Chapter 5; and

(4)

at such other times as may be ordered by the Court.

(b)

Extensions. —

Upon written application of the supervised personal representative stating reasons for the request, the Court may, for good cause shown, extend the time for rendering an account to a specified date.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(qq), 42 DCR 63
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 19(f), 44 DCR 1271
1981 Ed., § 20-724.
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-701.01.